Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.110

Driving while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug—Enhanced enforcement of related laws—Assignment of visiting district judges—Powers, expenses.

The administrator for the courts may assign one or more district judges from other judicial districts to serve as visiting district judges in a judicial district which the administrator determines is experiencing an increase in case filings as the result of enhanced enforcement of laws related to driving, or being in physical control of, a motor vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug. The prosecuting, city, or town attorney of the county, city, or town in which a judicial district lies, or the presiding judge of the judicial district, may request the administrator for the courts to designate the district as an enhanced enforcement district and to make assignments under this section. An assignment shall be for a specified period of time not to exceed thirty days. A visiting district judge has the same powers as a district judge of the district to which he or she is assigned. A visiting district judge shall be reimbursed for expenses under RCW 2.56.070.

[ 1991 c 290 s 1; 1987 c 202 s 109; 1983 c 165 s 31.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Legislative finding, intent—Effective dates—Severability—1983 c 165: See notes following RCW 46.20.308.

Venue, criminal actions: RCW 3.66.070.